Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB393.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Senior Citizens' Property Tax Freeze Act.Section 2. Exemption from property tax increases.A political subdivision that imposes a real property tax on residential property shall not increase the tax or the tax rate on the real property of an individual if all of the following apply:(1) The individual is 65 years of age or older.(2) The individual currently resides on the property for which the exemption is claimed and has resided on that property for at least five consecutive years immediately prior to claiming the exemption.123456789101112131415161718 (3) Neither the individual nor any other person with whom the individual owns the property by joint tenancy, tenancy in common or tenancy by the entireties is currently claiming or otherwise receiving an exemption under this section as to other property located in this Commonwealth.(4) The individual's annual income, as defined in Chapter 13 of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act, is not more than $65,000.Section 3. Application for exemption.An individual may apply for the exemption allowed under section 2 by filing, with the political subdivision that imposes the tax, a notarized statement containing all of the following:(1) The applicant's name, residential address and Social Security number.(2) A certification that the individual is 65 years of age or older, currently resides on the property for which the exemption is claimed and has resided on that property for at least five consecutive years immediately prior to claiming the exemption.(3) The names and Social Security numbers of all other owners of the property for which the exemption is claimed.(4) A certification that no taxes are in arrears for the property.(5) Evidence that the individual's annual income does not exceed $65,000.Section 4. Termination of exemption.(a) Sale or transfer.--Except as provided in subsection (b), the exemption allowed under section 2 shall be terminated, and the tax and tax rate shall become current upon sale or transfer 20250SB0393PN0339 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the property for which the exemption is in effect, including a transfer under a recorded real property sales contract.(b) Exception.--The exemption from property tax increase shall not be terminated under subsection (a) if the sale or transfer is to a joint owner, tenant in common or tenant by the entireties who is 64 years of age or older at the time of the sale or transfer and who is otherwise entitled to claim the exemption.Section 5. Reimbursement by Commonwealth.The Department of Revenue shall reimburse political subdivisions annually for the difference between the real property taxes imposed upon individuals who are receiving exemptions under this act and the tax liability which would have been imposed if the exemptions had not been granted.Section 6. Applicability.This act shall apply to the tax year beginning January 1, 2026, and to all subsequent tax years.Section 7. Repeal.All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with this act.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0393PN0339 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122